Hawaii, session 2025, SB1642.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $783,231,649 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the seventh senatorial district as follows: 1.   Department of Transportation A.   Plans, design, and construction for the State to deploy a plane within twenty-four hours' notice for emergency situations; equipment and appurtenances. Total funding                                 $500,000 B.   Apron light replacement for Kahului Airport and Lanai Airport. Total funding                              $46,446,000 C.   Installation of wastewater and water treatment system. Total funding                              $23,888,500 2.   Kahului Airport A.   Kahului Airport master plan, noise exposure map, and noise compatibility program. Total funding                               $3,610,000 B.   Resurfacing of runways 2 through 20. Total funding                              $10,381,167 C.   Repaving runways 2 through 20 phase 2 (outboard lanes). Total funding                              $25,000,000 D.   Aircraft rescue and fire fighting training pit replacement. Total funding                              $19,689,256 E.   Aircraft rescue and fire fighting truck shelter. Total funding                               $3,338,000 F.   Emergency generator modifications. Total funding                              $13,250,000 G.   Holdroom and gate improvements. Total funding                              $72,517,104 H.   Ticket lobby improvements. Total funding                              $68,900,000 I.   Fuel rack site preparation. Total funding                              $33,000,000 J.   Cesspool closure and individual water system replacement. Total funding                               $3,000,000 K.   Fire alarm system upgrade. Total funding                               $5,351,697 L.   South Transportation Security Administration checkpoint. Total funding                              $57,920,562 M.   Inbound baggage handling system improvements. Total funding                              $15,625,352 N.   Inbound baggage handling system improvements phase 2. Total funding                              $22,000,000 O.   Outbound baggage handling system replacement. Total funding                              $62,500,000 P.   Reconstruction of concrete apron at gates 1 through 39. Total funding                               $6,856,500 Q.   Repaving runways 5 through 23. Total funding                              $22,645,350 R.   Repaving general aviation aircraft parking (east ramp). Total funding                              $45,864,000 S.   Repaving asphalt concrete pavement fronting hardstands. Total funding                              $14,332,500 T.   Perimeter fence replacement. Total funding                              $17,000,000 U.   Runways 2 through 20 environmental impact statement. Total funding                               $5,500,000 3.   Molokai Airport A.   Repaving runways 17 through 35 and taxiway E. Total funding                              $18,229,771 B.   Wastewater system improvements. Total funding                               $3,000,000 C.   Repaving taxiway A. Total funding                               $5,759,250 D.   Repaving runways 5 through 23. Total funding                              $20,065,500 E.   Repaving taxiways B, C, and E. Total funding                               $3,605,176 F.   Repaving terminal apron area. Total funding                               $3,023,718 G.   Perimeter fence replacement. Total funding                              $11,000,000 4.   Hana Airport A.   Reconstruction of main baseyard building; equipment and appurtenances. Total funding                               $5,000,000 B.   Cesspool closure and individual water system replacement. Total funding                               $1,000,000 C.   Repaving runways 8 through 26. Total funding                              $23,069,813 D.   Repaving terminal apron and taxiways. Total funding                               $8,599,500 5.   Lanai Airport A.   Wastewater system improvements. Total funding                               $2,500,000 B.   Perimeter fence replacement. Total funding                               $9,900,000 6.   Kalaupapa Airport A.   Replacement of runway lighting and navigational aid. Total funding                               $4,319,595 B.   Repaving terminal apron area. Total funding                              $16,893,338 7.   Haiku Elementary School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 8.   Hana High and Elementary School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 9.   Kalama Intermediate School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 10.  Kaunakakai Elementary School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 11.  Kekaulike High School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $750,000 Construction                 $4,000,000 Total funding                               $4,750,000 B.   Design and construction for band room improvements, including hazmat removal. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 12.  Kilohana Elementary School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 13.  Kualapuu Public Conversion Charter School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 14.  Kula Elementary School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 15.  Lanai High and Elementary School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $750,000 Construction                 $4,000,000 Total funding                               $4,750,000 16.  Makawao Elementary School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 17.  Maunaloa Elementary School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 18.  Molokai High School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $750,000 Construction                 $4,000,000 Total funding                               $4,750,000 19.  Molokai Middle School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 20.  Paia Elementary School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 21.  Pukalani Elementary School A.   Design and construction for the replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 22.  Kalaupapa Warehouse A.   Removal of old roof and installation of new roof on primary storage warehouse. Total funding                               $1,400,000 SECTION 2. The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3. The sum appropriated for the respective capital projects set forth in section 1 shall be expended for the purposes of this Act as follows: (1)  The sum appropriated in items 1 through 6 shall be expended by the department of transportation; (2)  The sum appropriated in items 7 through 21 shall be expended by the department of education; and (3)  The sum appropriated in item 22 shall be expended by the department of health. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________